District of Columbia statutes.
7-206

Infants of unknown parentage.

(a)

A person who assumes legal custody of a live born infant of unknown parentage shall report the following information to the Registrar, within 5 days after taking custody:

(1)

Date and place child was found;

(2)

Sex, race, and approximate birth date of child;

(3)

Name and address of the person or institution with whom the child has been placed for care;

(4)

Name given to the child by the custodian of the child; and

(5)

Any other data required by the Registrar.

(b)

The place where the child was found shall be entered as the place of birth.

(c)

A report registered under this section shall constitute the certificate of birth for the child.

(d)

If the child is identified and a certificate of birth is obtained, the report registered under this section shall be sealed and placed in a special file and shall not be subject to inspection except upon order of the Court (or as provided by regulation).

History

Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-34, § 7, 28 DCR 3271

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-206.